el: Σπίτι & κήπος > Ασφάλεια επιχειρήσεων & σπιτιού: Ψεύτικες κάμερες παρακολούθησης; Οικιακά συστήματα συναγερμού; Αισθητήρες κίνησης; Καθρέφτες ασφαλείας; Φώτα ασφαλείας; Οθόνες & συσκευές εγγραφής ασφαλείας; Αξεσουάρ ασφαλείας; Χρηματοκιβώτια ασφαλείας; Αισθητήρες συστημάτων ασφαλείας
nb: Hjem og hage > Bedrifts- og hjemmesikkerhet: Falske overvåkningskameraer; Hjemmealarmsystemer; Bevegelsessensorer; Sikkerhets- og trygghetsspeil; Sikkerhetslys; Sikkerhetsskjermer og -opptakere; Tilbehør til sikkerhetssafer; Sikkerhetssafer; Sikkerhetssystemsensorer
es: Casa y jardín > Seguridad empresarial y del hogar: Cámaras de vigilancia ocultas; Sistemas de alarmas para el hogar; Sensores de movimiento; Espejos de vigilancia y seguridad; Alumbrado de seguridad; Cámaras y monitores de seguridad; Accesorios para cajas de seguridad; Cajas fuertes; Sensores de sistemas de seguridad
tr: Ev ve Bahçe > İş ve Ev Güvenliği: Sahte Güvenlik Kameraları; Ev Alarm Sistemleri; Hareket Sensörleri; Emniyet ve Güvenlik Aynaları; Güvenlik Lambaları; Güvenlik Monitör ve Kayıt Cihazları; Güvenlik Kasası Aksesuarları; Güvenlik Kasaları; Güvenlik Sistemi Sensörleri
ru: Дом и сад > Безопасность жилой и коммерческой недвижимости: Муляжи камер видеонаблюдения; Системы сигнализации для дома; Датчики движения; Обзорные зеркала; Охранное освещение; Мониторы и регистраторы для системы безопасности; Аксессуары для сейфов; Сейфы; Датчики для системы безопасности
lt-LT: Namai ir sodas > Verslo ir namų apsauga: Stebėjimo kamerų muliažai; Namų signalizacijos sistemos; Judesio jutikliai; Saugos ir apsaugos veidrodžiai; Apsaugos žibintai; Apsaugos monitoriai ir įrašymo įrenginiai; Seifų priedai; Seifai; Apsaugos sistemų jutikliai
vi: Nhà và vườn > An ninh doanh nghiệp và nhà ở: Mô hình camera giám sát; Hệ thống báo động trong nhà; Cảm biến chuyển động; Gương an ninh và an toàn; Đèn cảnh báo an ninh; Máy quay và thiết bị giám sát an ninh; Phụ kiện an toàn an ninh; Két an toàn; Cảm biến hệ thống an ninh
sl-SI: Dom in vrt > Varovanje poslovnih in domačih prostorov: Lažne nadzorne kamere; Domači alarmni sistemi; Senzorji gibanja; Varnostna in varovalna ogledala; Varnostne luči; Varnostni monitorji in snemalniki; Dodatki za varnostne sefe; Varnostni sefi; Senzorji za varnostni sistem
sk-SK: Dom a záhrada > Zabezpečenie firmy a domácnosti: Atrapy skrytých kamier; Domáce poplašné systémy; Pohybové senzory; Bezpečnostné zrkadlá; Bezpečnostné svetlá; Bezpečnostné monitory a záznamníky; Bezpečnostné príslušenstvo; Bezpečnostné trezory; Senzory bezpečnostného systému
nl: Huis en tuin > Bedrijfs- en woonhuisbeveiliging: Namaakbeveiligingscamera's; Thuisalarmsystemen; Bewegingssensoren; Veiligheids- en bewakingsspiegels; Beveiligingslampen; Beveiligingsmonitoren en -recorders; Accessoires voor veiligheidskluizen; Kluizen; Beveiligingssysteemsensoren
sv: Hem och trädgård > Företags- och hemsäkerhet: Falska övervakningskameror; Hemlarmsystem; Rörelsedetektorer; Säkerhetsspeglar; Säkerhetslampor; Säkerhetsmonitorer och videokameror; Kassaskåpstillbehör; Kassaskåp; Sensorer till säkerhetssystem
en: Home & Garden > Business & Home Security: Dummy Surveillance Cameras; Home Alarm Systems; Motion Sensors; Safety & Security Mirrors; Security Lights; Security Monitors & Recorders; Security Safe Accessories; Security Safes; Security System Sensors
th: บ้านและสวน > ความปลอดภัยของธุรกิจและบ้าน: กล้องวงจรปิดปลอม; ระบบสัญญาณกันขโมยในบ้าน; เซนเซอร์การเคลื่อนไหว; กระจกรักษาความปลอดภัย; ไฟสำหรับความปลอดภัย; จอภาพและเครื่องบันทึกสำหรับความปลอดภัย; อุปกรณ์ตู้นิรภัย; ตู้นิรภัย; เซ็นเซอร์ระบบรักษาความปลอดภัย
cs: Dům a zahrada > Zabezpečení firem a domácností: Falešné bezpečnostní kamery; Domácí bezpečnostní systémy; Pohybová čidla; Bezpečnostní zrcadla; Bezpečnostní světla; Bezpečnostní kamery a záznamníky; Trezory – příslušenství; Trezory; Bezpečnostní senzory
pt-BR: Casa e jardim > Segurança domiciliar e comercial: Câmeras de vigilância falsas; Sistemas de alarme domiciliar; Sensores de movimento; Espelhos de segurança; Luzes de segurança; Monitores e câmeras de segurança; Acessórios de segurança para cofres; Cofres; Sensores de sistema de segurança
ko: 가정/원예 용품 > 기업/가정 보안: 눈속임용 감시 카메라; 가정용 경보 시스템; 움직임 감지 센서; 안전/보안용 반사경; 보안등; 보안 카메라/녹화기; 금고 부대용품; 금고; 보안 시스템 센서
pt-PT: Casa e jardim > Segurança na empresa e em casa: Câmaras de vigilância falsas; Sistemas de alarme domésticos; Sensores de movimento; Espelhos de segurança e proteção; Luzes de segurança; Monitores e gravadores de segurança; Acessórios de segurança; Cofres de segurança; Sensores de sistema de segurança
zh-TW: 居家和庭園 > 居家/企業保全: 仿真監視攝影機; 家庭警報系統; 動作感測器; 安全鏡; 安全照明; 監視攝影機; 保險箱配件; 保險箱; 保全系統感測器
ja: ホーム・ガーデン > 防犯・セキュリティ: 防犯用ダミーカメラ; 住宅用警報システム; モーションセンサー; 安全/防犯ミラー; 防犯ライト; 防犯カメラ; 金庫関連用品; 金庫; 防犯センサー
fi: Koti ja puutarha > Yritysten ja kodin turvallisuus: Hämäysvalvontakamerat; Kodin hälytysjärjestelmät; Liiketunnistimet; Turva- ja valvontapeilit; Turvavalaisimet; Valvontamonitorit ja -nauhurit; Tallelokeroiden lisätarvikkeet; Tallelokerot; Turvajärjestelmäanturit
hu: Otthon és kert > Üzleti és otthoni biztonság: Hamis megfigyelőkamerák; Otthoni riasztórendszerek; Mozgásérzékelők; Biztonsági tükrök; Biztonsági fények; Biztonsági monitorok és felvevők; Biztonságiszéf-kiegészítők; Biztonsági széfek; Biztonságirendszer-érzékelők
ro-RO: Casă și grădină > Securitatea afacerii și a locuinței: Camere de supraveghere false; Sisteme de alarmă pentru locuință; Senzori de mișcare; Oglinzi de siguranță și securitate; Lumini de securitate; Monitoare și dispozitive de înregistrare de securitate; Accesorii pentru seifuri de securitate; Seifuri de securitate; Senzori pentru sistemul de securitate
it: Casa e giardino > Sicurezza in casa e sul lavoro: Telecamere di sorveglianza finte; Sistemi d'allarme domestici; Sensori di movimento; Specchi di sicurezza; Luci di sicurezza; Monitor e sistemi di registrazione di sicurezza; Accessori per casseforti; Casseforti; Sensori sistemi sicurezza
bg-BG: Дом и градина > Сигурност за дома и офиса: Фалшиви камери за наблюдение; Домашни алармени системи; Сензори за движение; Огледала за безопасност и сигурност; Охранителни светлини; Монитори и записващи устройства за сигурност; Аксесоари за сейф; Сейфове за сигурност; Сензори за система за сигурност
da: Hjem og have > Sikkerhed i hjemmet: Falske overvågningskameraer; Alarmsystemer til private; Bevægelsessensorer; Sikkerhedsspejle; Sikkerhedslamper; Sikkerhedsskærme og -optagere; Tilbehør til sikkerhedsbokse; Sikkerhedsskabe; Sensorer til sikkerhedssystemer
de: Heim & Garten > Haussicherheit: Überwachungskamera-Attrappen; Hausalarmsysteme; Bewegungsmelder; Sicherheitsspiegel; Sicherheitsleuchten; Überwachungsmonitore & -rekorder; Safe-Zubehör; Safes & Tresore; Sensoren für Sicherheitssysteme
pl: Dom i ogród > Bezpieczeństwo domu i biura: Atrapy kamer przemysłowych; Systemy alarmów domowych; Czujniki ruchu; Lustra bezpieczeństwa; Światła bezpieczeństwa; Monitory i rejestratory bezpieczeństwa; Akcesoria do sejfów; Sejfy; Czujniki systemu bezpieczeństwa
zh-CN: 家居与园艺 > 保险柜/保险箱: 仿真监控摄像机; 家庭报警系统; 运动传感器; 安全镜; 安全灯; 安全监视器/记录仪; 保险柜/保险箱/保管箱配件; 保险柜; 安全系统传感器
hr-HR: Dom i vrt > Sigurnost na poslu i kod kuće: Lažne nadzorne kamere; Sustavi kućnih alarma; Senzori pokreta; Sigurnosna ogledala; Sigurnosna svjetla; Sigurnosni monitori i uređaji za snimanje; Dodaci za sigurnosne sefove; Sigurnosni sefovi; Senzori sigurnosnog sustava
fr: Maison et jardin > Sécurité à domicile et au bureau: Caméras de surveillance factices; Systèmes d’alarme domestiques; Détecteurs de mouvement; Miroirs de sécurité et de surveillance; Lampes de sécurité; Systèmes de surveillance et d’enregistrement; Accessoires pour coffres-forts; Coffres-forts; Détecteurs pour systèmes de sécurité